Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1126.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Epinephrine Delivery Systems.--(a) A health insurance entity licensed in this Commonwealth to offer, issue or renew any individual or group health, sickness or accident policy or subscriber contract or certificate that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care 12345678910111213141516171819202122 facility or licensed health care provider, and a certified health plan corporation or general medical service corporation engaged in the business of maintaining and operating a nonprofit professional health service plan in this Commonwealth, shall include coverage for, at a minimum, two medically prescribed epinephrine delivery systems:(1) prescribed by a health care provider; and(2) at an amount not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35) annually regardless of the insured's deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other cost-sharing requirement.(b) The coverage required under subsection (a) may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance as deemed appropriate by the Insurance Commissioner.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a health care group, general medical service corporation or hospital service corporation from reducing a covered person's cost sharing to an amount that is lower than the amount specified in subsection (a).(d) The Insurance Department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement and enforce the maximum price established under this section.(e) The Attorney General shall:(1) Investigate pricing of prescription epinephrine drugs to ensure that adequate pricing of prescription epinephrine drugs is achieved and to determine if additional consumer protections are necessary. As part of the investigation, the Attorney General shall gather, complete and analyze information concerning business practices, pricing, data and other information regarding epinephrine drug manufacturers' roles in the current prices of epinephrine prescription drugs.20250SB1126PN1371 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Submit the findings of the investigation under this subsection in a report to the General Assembly, which shall be made accessible to the public no later than one year after the effective date of this paragraph. The report shall include:(i) A summary of epinephrine pricing practices and factors that contribute to the pricing of health insurance plans.(ii) Public policy recommendations to control and prevent overpricing of prescription epinephrine drugs made available to consumers in this Commonwealth.(iii) Any other information that the Attorney General finds necessary to complete the report.(f) This section shall apply to:(1) A high deductible health plan to the maximum extent permitted by Federal law. If the plan is used to establish a medical savings account under section 220 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 220) or a health savings account under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 223), this section shall apply to the plan to the maximum extent that is permitted by Federal law and does not disqualify the account for the deduction allowed under section 220 or 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as applicable.(2) A plan that meets the requirements of a catastrophic plan, as defined in 45 CFR 156.155 (relating to enrollment in catastrophic plans), to the maximum extent permitted by Federal law.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Epinephrine delivery system." A single-use device used for 20250SB1126PN1371 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the automatic injection of, or a single-dose nasal spray device used for the delivery of, a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body."High deductible health plan." A health insurance policy as defined in section 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)), only after the covered person's deductible has been satisfied for the year.Section 2. This act shall apply to all policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered or amended on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1126PN1371 - 4 - 1234567891011